Utah statutes.
72-3-301.   Statewide public safety interest highway defined -- Designations
-- Control -- Maintenance -- Improvement restrictions -- Formula funding
provisions.
(1)  As used in this part, "statewide public safety interest highway" means a
designated state highway that serves a compelling statewide public safety
interest.
(2)  Statewide public safety interest highways include:
(a)  SR-900.  From near the east bound on and off ramps of the I-80 Delle
Interchange on the I-80 south frontage road, traversing northwesterly,
westerly, and northeasterly, including on portions of a county road and a
Bureau of Land Management road for a distance of 9.24 miles.  Then beginning
again at the I-80 south frontage road traversing southwesterly and
northwesterly on a county road for a distance of 4.33 miles.  Then beginning
again at the I-80 south frontage road traversing southwesterly, northerly,
northwesterly, westerly, and northeasterly on a county road and  a Bureau of
Land Management road to near the east bound on and off ramps of I-80
Low/Lakeside Interchange for a distance of 2.61 miles.  The entire length of
SR-900 is a total distance of 16.18 miles.
(b)  SR-901.  From SR-196 traversing westerly and northwesterly on a county
road to a junction with a Bureau of Land Management road described as part of
SR-901, then northwesterly to a junction with a county road for a distance of
8.70 miles.  Then beginning again at a junction with SR-901 traversing
northwesterly on a Bureau of Land Management road to a junction with a county
road for a distance of 6.52 miles.  Then beginning again at a junction with
SR-901 traversing southwesterly on a Bureau of Land Management road to a
junction with a county road for a distance of 5.44 miles.  Then beginning
again from a junction with SR-901 traversing southwesterly on a county road to
a junction with a county road a distance of 11.52 miles.  Then beginning again
at a junction with SR-196 traversing westerly on a Bureau of Land Management
road to a junction with a county road for a distance of 11.30 miles.  The
entire length of SR-901 is a total distance of 43.48 miles.
(3)  The department has jurisdiction and control over all statewide public
safety interest highways.
(4) (a)  A county shall maintain the portions of a statewide public safety
interest highway that was a class B county road under the county's
jurisdiction prior to the designation under this section.
(b)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 17-50-305, a county may not
abandon any portion of a statewide public safety interest highway.
(c)  Except under written authorization of the executive director of the
department, a statewide public safety interest highway shall remain the same
class of highway that it was prior to the designation under this section with
respect to grade, drainage, surface, and improvements and it may not be
upgraded or improved to a higher class of highway.
(5)  A class B county road that is designated a statewide public safety
interest highway under this section is considered a class B county road for
the purposes of the distribution formula and distributions of funds.  The
amount of funds received by any jurisdiction from the class B and C roads
account under Section 72-2-107 may not be affected by the provisions of this
section.
